test/src/dict-gt-yamls/N-lex_avdo-dict-gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.xfst

Tests:


  Noun - avdo: # ALGA ok  FUOM EROHUS! avdo+N+Sg+Com:%>in K ;  !avdoin ja ALGA 	          +N+Sg+Com:%^SVLOW%>in  K ;			! algáin  
    avdo+N+Sg+Nom:  avdo
    avdo+N+Sg+Gen:  aavdo
    avdo+N+Sg+Acc:  aavdo
    avdo+N+Sg+Ill:  aavdon
    avdo+N+Sg+Loc:  aavdost
    avdo+N+Sg+Com:  avdoin
    avdo+N+Sg+Abe:  aˊvdottáá
    avdo+N+Ess:  avdon
    avdo+N+Par:  avdod
    avdo+N+Pl+Nom:  aavdoh
    avdo+N+Pl+Gen:  [aavdoi, aˊvdoi]
    avdo+N+Pl+Acc:  aavdoid
    avdo+N+Pl+Ill:  avdoid
    avdo+N+Pl+Loc:  aavdoin
    avdo+N+Pl+Com:  aˊvdoiguin
    avdo+N+Pl+Abe:  aˊvdoittáá
    
  Noun - pivdo:  # ALGA  FUOM EROHUS! avdo+N+Sg+Com:%>in K ;  !avdoin ja ALGA 	          +N+Sg+Com:%^SVLOW%>in  K ;			! algáin
    pivdo+N+Sg+Nom:  pivdo
    pivdo+N+Sg+Gen:  piˊvdo
    pivdo+N+Sg+Acc:  piˊvdo
    pivdo+N+Sg+Ill:  piivdon
    pivdo+N+Sg+Loc: [piivdost, pivdoost]
    pivdo+N+Sg+Com:  pivdoin
    pivdo+N+Sg+Abe:  piˊvdottáá
    pivdo+N+Ess:  pivdon
    pivdo+N+Par:  pivdod
    pivdo+N+Pl+Nom:  piˊvdoh
    pivdo+N+Pl+Gen: [piivdoi, piˊvdoi]
    pivdo+N+Pl+Acc:  pivdoid
    pivdo+N+Pl+Ill:  pivdoid
    pivdo+N+Pl+Loc:  piˊvdoin
    pivdo+N+Pl+Com:  piˊvdoiguin
    pivdo+N+Pl+Abe:  piˊvdoittáá
